Maryland, session 2025, SB0619.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
(Three–fifths of all the members elected to each of the two Houses concurring), That it be
proposed that the Maryland Constitution read as follows:
Article IV – Judiciary Department
4A.
(a) There is a Commission on Judicial Disabilities composed of eleven persons
appointed by the Governor of Maryland, by and with the advice and consent of the Senate.
(b) The members of the Commission shall be citizens and residents of this State.
(c) (1) Three members of the Commission shall be appointed from among the
judges of the State, with one member representing the appellate courts, one member
representing the Circuit Courts, and one member representing the District Court.
(2) Three members shall be appointed from among those persons who are
admitted to practice law in the State, who have been so engaged for at least seven years,
and who are not judges of any court.
(3) Five members shall represent the public, who may not be active or
retired judges, who are not admitted to practice law in this State, and who may not have a
financial relationship with or receive compensation from a judge or a person admitted to
practice law in this State.
(4) The composition of the Commission should reflect the race, gender, and
geographic diversity of the population of the State.
(d) [The] SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF § 4B(A)(5) OF THIS ARTICLE,
THE term of office of each member is four years commencing on January 1 following the
expiration of the member’s predecessor’s term. A member may not serve more than two
four–year terms, or for more than a total of ten years if appointed to fill a vacancy.
(e) A member’s membership automatically terminates:
(1) When any member of the Commission appointed from among judges in
the State ceases to be a judge;
(2) When any member appointed from among those admitted to practice
law becomes a judge;
(3) When any member representing the public becomes a judge or is
admitted to the practice of law in this State or has a financial relationship with or receives
compensation from a judge or a person admitted to practice law in this State; or
(4) When any member ceases to be a resident of the State.

SENATE BILL 619 3
(f) Any vacancies on the Commission shall be filled for the unexpired term by the
Governor in the same manner as for making of appointments to the Commission and
subject to the same qualifications which were applicable to the person causing the vacancy.
(g) A member of the Commission may not receive any compensation for the
member’s services as such but shall be allowed any expenses necessarily incurred in the
performance of the member’s duties as such member.
4B.
(a) (1) The Commission on Judicial Disabilities has the power to:
(i) Investigate complaints against any justice or judge of the
Supreme Court of Maryland, any intermediate courts of appeal, the circuit courts, the
District Court of Maryland, or the orphans’ court; and
(ii) Conduct hearings concerning such complaints, administer oaths
and affirmations, issue process to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production
of evidence, and require persons to testify and produce evidence by granting them immunity
from prosecution or from penalty or forfeiture.
(2) The Commission has the power to issue a reprimand and the power to
recommend to the Supreme Court of Maryland the removal, censure, or other appropriate
disciplining of a justice or judge or, in an appropriate case, retirement.
(3) All proceedings, testimony, and evidence before the Commission shall
be confidential and privileged, except as provided by rule of the Supreme Court of
Maryland; the record and any proceeding filed with the Supreme Court of Maryland shall
lose its confidential character, except as ordered by the Supreme Court of Maryland.
(4) No justice or judge shall participate as a member of the Commission in
any proceedings involving that justice’s or judge’s own conduct, and the Governor shall
appoint another justice or judge as a substitute member of the Commission for those
proceedings.
(5) (I) IN THE EVENT OF A MEMBER’S RECUSAL OR
DISQUALIFICATION OR THE EXPIRATION OF A MEMBER’S TERM WITHOUT A
REPLACEMENT, THE COMMISSION CHAIR MAY:
1. RECALL A FORMER MEMBER TO SERVE AS A
TEMPORARY SUBSTITUTE MEMBER; OR
2. REQUEST THAT THE GOVERNOR APPOINT A
TEMPORARY SUBSTITUTE MEMBER OR EXTEND A CURRENT MEMBER’S TERM.

SENATE BILL 619
(II) ON REQUEST OF THE COMMISSION CHAIR MADE UNDER
THIS PARAGRAPH, THE GOVERNOR MAY APPOINT A TEMPORARY SUBSTITUTE
MEMBER FOR A SPECIFIED PERIOD OR EXTEND A CURRENT MEMBER’S TERM UNTIL
A REPLACEMENT IS APPOINTED.
(III) ANY TEMPORARY SUBSTITUTE MEMBER IS:
1. IS SUBJECT TO THE SAME QUALIFICATIONS THAT
WERE APPLICABLE TO THE MEMBER FOR WHOM THE SUBSTITUTE IS TEMPORARILY
APPOINTED; AND
2. IF THE MEMBER IS A JUDGE OR AN ATTORNEY, MUST
BE A MEMBER IN GOOD STANDING OF THE MARYLAND BAR.
(6) The Supreme Court of Maryland shall prescribe by rule the means to
implement and enforce the powers of the Commission and the practice and procedure before
the Commission.
(b) (1) Upon any recommendation of the Commission, the Supreme Court of
Maryland, after a hearing and upon a finding of misconduct while in office, or of persistent
failure to perform the duties of the office, or of conduct prejudicial to the proper
administration of justice, may remove the justice or judge from office or may censure or
otherwise discipline the justice or judge, or the Supreme Court of Maryland, after hearing
and upon a finding of disability which is or is likely to become permanent and which
seriously interferes with the performance of the justice’s or judge’s duties, may retire the
justice or judge from office.
(2) A justice or judge removed under this section, and the justice’s or
judge’s surviving spouse, shall have the rights and privileges accruing from the justice’s or
judge’s judicial service only to the extent prescribed by the order of removal.
(3) A justice or judge retired under this section shall have the rights and
privileges prescribed by law for other retired justices or judges.
(4) No justice of the Supreme Court of Maryland shall sit in judgment in
any hearing involving that justice’s own conduct.
(c) This section is alternative to, and cumulative with, the methods of retirement
and removal provided in Sections 3 and 4 of this Article, and in Section 26 of Article III of
this Constitution.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the General Assembly
determines that the amendment to the Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this
Act affects multiple jurisdictions and that the provisions of Article XIV, § 1 of the Maryland
Constitution concerning local approval of constitutional amendments do not apply.

SENATE BILL 619 5
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the amendment to the
Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this Act shall be submitted to the qualified
voters of the State at the next general election to be held in November 2026 for adoption or
rejection in accordance with Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution. At that general
election, the vote on the proposed amendment to the Constitution shall be by ballot, and on
each ballot there shall be printed the words “For the Constitutional Amendment” and
“Against the Constitutional Amendment”, as now provided by law. Immediately after the
election, all returns shall be made to the Governor of the vote for and against the proposed
amendment, as directed by Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution, and further
proceedings had in accordance with Article XIV.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.